Hawaii statutes.
§142-44 Owners of unbranded animals.
All cattle, horses, mules, donkeys, sheep, goats, and swine, over twelve months
of age, not marked or branded, which may be running wild at any time on any
lands in the State, shall belong to and be the property of the owners or
lessees of the lands on which the animals are then running. [L 1870, c 30, §1;
am L 1874, c 27, §1; RL 1925, §684; RL 1935, §262; RL 1945, §1071; am L 1951, c
32, §1; RL 1955, §20-43; HRS §142-44]

Case Notes

Effect of brand,
prior to statute. 2 H. 367.

Enumerated animals in
this section are property and subjects of larceny. 4 H. 409.

Cited: 20 H. 7, 30.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next